Utah statutes.
73-16-4.   Members of commission.

(1)  There shall be three members of the Bear River Compact commission from the state of Utah. 

(2)  One member shall be the interstate stream commissioner of Utah and he shall be chairman of the Utah delegation.  The other two commissioners from Utah shall be appointed by the state water and power board with the consent of the governor, and they shall hold office at the pleasure of the water and power board and until their successors shall have been appointed and qualified. 

(3)  Each member shall be a bona fide resident of the state of Utah and one shall be a landowner and irrigator actually residing on and operating a farm within the lower division as defined by the compact and one shall be a landowner and irrigator actually residing on and operating a farm within the upper division as defined by the compact. 

(4)  The Utah water and power board may with the consent of the governor appoint two alternate members of the Bear River commission. 

(a)  One such alternate shall be a bona fide resident of the state of Utah and a landowner and irrigator actually residing on and operating a farm within the lower division as defined by the compact and he shall be entitled to act at all regular and special meetings of the Bear River commission whenever the regular member of the commission from this same area is unable to serve and act. 

(b)  One such alternate shall be a bona fide resident of the state of Utah and shall be a landowner and irrigator actually residing on and operating a farm within the upper division as defined by the compact and he shall be entitled to act at all regular and special meetings of the Bear River commission whenever the regular member of the commission from this same area is unable to serve and act. 

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

